dictionaries/hy/src/hy_AM.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY անմիողտեըցկչյԱՆՄԻՈՂՏԵԸՑԿՉՅ
FLAG long

WORDCHARS ֊՛՜՞՚
IGNORE ֊՛՜՞
NEEDAFFIX 00

REP 31
REP	եվ	և
REP	եվ	եվ
REP	եւ	և
REP 	գ	կ
REP 	կ	գ
REP 	գ	ք
REP 	ք	գ
REP 	ք	կ
REP 	կ	ք
REP 	ե	է
REP 	է 	ե
REP	ո	օ
REP	օ	ո
REP	հ	յ
REP	յ	հ
REP	եք	էք
REP	յու	իւ
REP	ույ	ոյ
REP	եի	էի
REP	վ	ու
REP	վ	ւ
REP	ա	այ
REP	ո	ոյ
REP	ր	ռ
REP	ռ	ր
REP	եա	էա
REP	եր ներ
REP	ներ եր
REP	նդեր	ունդներ
REP	մբեր ումբներ
REP	նդներ ունդներ
REP	հրդեր հուրդներ
REP	նկեր ունկեր
REP	ռեր իռներ
REP	իծներ ծեր
REP	վտեր վիտներ
REP	պտեր պիտներ

PFX CC Y 1
PFX CC 0	ամենա	.

PFX CH Y 2
PFX CH	0	չ/PR	.
PFX CH	0	կ/PR	. 

SFX DE Y 5
SFX DE	0       ս	.
SFX DE	0       դ	.
SFX DE	0	ը	[^աեէիոօւ]
SFX DE	0	ն       .
SFX DE  0	ան/ABIN	.

SFX DI Y 1
SFX DI	0	յան/DEABGEINLO	.

# polysyllabics
SFX PP Y 1
SFX PP   0     ներ/DEABGEINLO [^յ]

#vowelreduction plurals
SFX PX Y 50
SFX PX ուկ	կներ/DEABGEINLO  .
SFX PX ումբ	մբեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ունդ	նդեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուզ	զեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուրդ	րդեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX թիվ	թվեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իզբ	զբներ/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուն	ներ/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իթ	թեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուղթ	ղթեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իծ	ծեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուծ	ծեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուխ	խեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ունկ	նկեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ունձ	նձեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուրձ	րձեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ինձ	նձեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իղ	ղեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իճ	ճեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ին	ներ/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուն	ներ/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իշ	շեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուշ	շեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ինչ	նչեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ունչ	նչեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ինջ	նջեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ունջ	նջեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իս	սեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուրջ	րջեր/DEABGEINLO  .
SFX PX իչ	չեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իջ	ջեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իռ	ռեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուռ	ռեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իտ	տեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուտ	տեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իր	րեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուր	րեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իշտ	շտեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուշտ	շտեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իրտ	րտեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուրտ	րտեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ից	ցեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուց	ցեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իտք	տքեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուտք	տքեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX իրք	րքեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX կիր	կրներ/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX գիր	գրեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ինդ	նդեր/DEABGEINLO .
SFX PX ուփ	փեր/DEABGEINLO .

# monosyllabic
SFX PI Y 1
SFX PI ուռ	ռներ/DEABGEINLO . 

# monosyllabic
SFX PM Y 1
SFX PM   0     եր/DEABGEINLO          .

# collectives
SFX PZ Y 6
SFX PZ 0	ենք/DE .
SFX PZ 0	ենց/DE .
SFX PZ ա	այենք/DE .
SFX PZ ա	այենց/DE .
SFX PZ օ	ոյենք/DE .
SFX PZ օ	ոյենց/DE .

# ablative  ուց  ձիուց  եկեղեցուց
SFX A2 Y 6
SFX A2 	0	ուց	.
SFX A2 	ի	ուց/DE	.
SFX A2 	0	ուցս	.
SFX A2 	0	ուցդ	.
SFX A2 	0	ուցն	.
SFX A2 	0	ուցը	.

# ablative անից
SFX AA Y 5
SFX AA 	0	վանից	.
SFX AA 	0	վանիցս	.
SFX AA 	0	վանիցդ	.
SFX AA 	0	վանիցը	.
SFX AA	0	վանիցն	.

# ablative 
SFX AB Y 5
SFX AB 	0	ից	.
SFX AB 	0	իցս	.
SFX AB 	0	իցդ	.
SFX AB 	0	իցը	.
SFX AB	0	իցն	.

# ablative  շաբթի
#SFX AC Y 5
#SFX AC 	ի	վանից	.
#SFX AC 	ի	վանիցս	.
#SFX AC 	ի	վանիցդ	.
#SFX AC 	ի	վանիցը	.
#SFX AC		ի	վանիցն	.

# ablative միջից
SFX A3 Y 1
SFX A3 մեջ	միջից/DE .

# ayi, oyi
SFX A4 Y 2
SFX A4  ա	այից/DE	.
SFX A4  ո	ոյից/DE	.

# ablative  իկ-կից
SFX AX Y 54
SFX AX  իկ	կից/DE .
SFX AX  ուկ	կից/DE .
SFX AX  ումբ	մբից/DE .
SFX AX  ունդ	նդից/DE .
SFX AX  ուրդ	րդից/DE .
SFX AX  իզբ	զբից/DE .
SFX AX  իթ	թից/DE .
SFX AX  ուզ	զից/DE  .
SFX AX  ուղթ	ղթից/DE  .
SFX AX իժ		ժից/DE  .
SFX AX իծ		ծից/DE .
SFX AX ուծ		ծից/DE .
SFX AX ուխ		խից/DE  .
SFX AX ունկ		նկից/DE . 
SFX AX ունձ		նձից/DE .
SFX AX ուրձ		րձից/DE .
SFX AX ինձ		նձից/DE .
SFX AX իղ		ղից/DE .
SFX AX իճ		ճից/DE .
SFX AX ին		նից/DE .
SFX AX ուն		նից/DE .
SFX AX իշ		շից/DE .
SFX AX ուշ		շից/DE .
SFX AX ու		վից/DE .
SFX AX ունչ		նչից/DE .
SFX AX ինջ		նջից/DE .
SFX AX ունջ		նջից/DE .
SFX AX իսպ		սպից/DE .
SFX AX իս		սից/DE .
SFX AX ուրջ		րջից/DE  .
SFX AX իչ		չից/DE .
SFX AX իջ		ջից/DE .
SFX AX իռ		ռից/DE .
SFX AX ուռ		ռից/DE .
SFX AX իտ		տից/DE .
SFX AX ուտ		տից/DE .
SFX AX իր		րից/DE .
SFX AX ուր		րից/DE .
SFX AX իշտ		շտից/DE .
SFX AX իստ		ստից/DE .
SFX AX ուշտ		շտից/DE .
SFX AX իրտ		րտից/DE .
SFX AX ուրտ		րտից/DE .
SFX AX ից		ցից/DE .
SFX AX ուց		ցից/DE .
SFX AX իտք		տքից/DE .
SFX AX ուտք		տքից/DE .
SFX AX իրք		րքից/DE .
SFX AX ինք		նքից/DE .
SFX AX ինդ		նդից/DE .
SFX AX ուփ		փից/DE .
SFX AX ուք		քից/DE . 
SFX AX ա		ից/DE .
SFX AX դուռ		դռնից/DE .

# միութեամբ, արեամբ
SFX I1 Y 1
SFX I1 յուն	յամբ/DE .

# եկեղեցով
SFX I2 Y 1
SFX I2  ի       ով/DE   .

# միջով
SFX I3 Y 1
SFX I3 մեջ	միջով/DE .

# ayi, oyi
SFX I4 Y 2
SFX I4  ա       այով/DE .
SFX I4  ո       ոյով/DE .

# ում → մամբ
SFX I5 Y 1
SFX I5 ում      մամբ .

# instrumental
SFX IN Y 5
SFX IN   0     ով/DE        .
SFX IN   0     ովս          .
SFX IN   0     ովդ          .
SFX IN   0     ովն          .
SFX IN   0     ովը          .

# instrumental with vowel reduction
SFX IX Y 55
SFX IX  իկ	կով/DE .
SFX IX  ուկ	կով/DE .
SFX IX  ումբ	մբով/DE .
SFX IX  ունդ	նդով/DE .
SFX IX  ուրդ	րդով/DE .
SFX IX  իզբ	զբով/DE .
SFX IX  իթ	թով/DE .
SFX IX  ուզ	զով/DE  .
SFX IX  ուղթ	ղթով/DE  .
SFX IX իժ		ժով/DE  .
SFX IX իծ		ծով/DE .
SFX IX ուծ		ծով/DE .
SFX IX ուխ		խով/DE  .
SFX IX ունկ		նկով/DE . 
SFX IX ունձ		նձով/DE .
SFX IX ուրձ		րձով/DE .
SFX IX ինձ		նձով/DE .
SFX IX իղ		ղով/DE .
SFX IX իճ		ճով/DE .
SFX IX ին		նով/DE .
SFX IX ուն		նով/DE .
SFX IX իշ		շով/DE .
SFX IX ուշ		շով/DE .
SFX IX ու		վով/DE .
SFX IX ունչ		նչով/DE .
SFX IX ինջ		նջով/DE .
SFX IX ունջ		նջով/DE .
SFX IX իսպ		սպով/DE .
SFX IX իս		սով/DE .
SFX IX ուրջ		րջով/DE  .
SFX IX իչ		չով/DE .
SFX IX իջ		ջով/DE .
SFX IX իռ		ռով/DE .
SFX IX ուռ		ռով/DE .
SFX IX իտ		տով/DE .
SFX IX ուտ		տով/DE .
SFX IX իվ		վով/DE .
SFX IX իր		րով/DE .
SFX IX ուր		րով/DE .
SFX IX իշտ		շտով/DE .
SFX IX իստ		ստով/DE .
SFX IX ուշտ		շտով/DE .
SFX IX իրտ		րտով/DE .
SFX IX ուրտ		րտով/DE .
SFX IX ից		ցով/DE .
SFX IX ուց		ցով/DE .
SFX IX իտք		տքով/DE .
SFX IX ուտք		տքով/DE .
SFX IX իրք		րքով/DE .
SFX IX ինք		նքով/DE .
SFX IX ինդ		նդով/DE .
SFX IX ուփ		փով/DE .
SFX IX ուք		քով/DE .
SFX IX ա		ով/DE .
SFX IX դուռ		դռնով/DE  . 

SFX LO Y 5
SFX LO  0       ում/DE  .
SFX LO  0       ումս    .
SFX LO  0       ումդ    .
SFX LO  0       ումն    .
SFX LO  0       ումը    .

# locative  եկեղեցում
SFX L2 Y 1
SFX L2  ի       ում/DE  .

# locative միջում
SFX L3 Y 1
SFX L3 մեջ	միջում/DE .

# ayi, oyi
SFX L4 Y 2
SFX L4  ա	այում/DE	.
SFX L4  ո	ոյում/DE	.

# locative  with vowel reduction
SFX LX Y 55
SFX LX  իկ	կում/DE .
SFX LX  ուկ	կում/DE .
SFX LX  ումբ	մբում/DE .
SFX LX  ունդ	նդում/DE .
SFX LX  ուրդ	րդում/DE .
SFX LX  իզբ	զբում/DE .
SFX LX  իթ	թում/DE .
SFX LX  ուզ	զում/DE  .
SFX LX  ուղթ	ղթում/DE  .
SFX LX իժ	ժում/DE  .
SFX LX իծ	ծում/DE .
SFX LX ուծ	ծում/DE .
SFX LX ուխ	խում/DE  .
SFX LX ունկ	նկում/DE . 
SFX LX ունձ	նձում/DE .
SFX LX ուրձ	րձում/DE .
SFX LX ինձ	նձում/DE .
SFX LX իղ	ղում/DE .
SFX LX իճ	ճում/DE .
SFX LX ին	նում/DE .
SFX LX ուն	նում/DE .
SFX LX իշ	շում/DE .
SFX LX ուշ	շում/DE .
SFX LX ու	վում/DE .
SFX LX ունչ	նչում/DE .
SFX LX ինջ	նջում/DE .
SFX LX ունջ	նջում/DE .
SFX LX իսպ	սպում/DE .
SFX LX իս	սում/DE .
SFX LX ուրջ	րջում/DE  .
SFX LX իչ	չում/DE .
SFX LX իջ	ջում/DE .
SFX LX իռ	ռում/DE .
SFX LX ուռ	ռում/DE .
SFX LX իտ	տում/DE .
SFX LX ուտ	տում/DE .
SFX LX իւ	ւում/DE .
SFX LX իր	րում/DE .
SFX LX ուր	րում/DE .
SFX LX իշտ	շտում/DE .
SFX LX իշտ	ստում/DE .
SFX LX ուշտ	շտում/DE .
SFX LX իրտ	րտում/DE .
SFX LX ուրտ	րտում/DE .
SFX LX ից	ցում/DE .
SFX LX ուց	ցում/DE .
SFX LX իտք	տքում/DE .
SFX LX ուտք	տքում/DE .
SFX LX իրք	րքում/DE .
SFX LX ինք	նքում/DE .
SFX LX ինդ	նդում/DE .
SFX LX ուփ	փում/DE .
SFX LX ուք	քում/DE .
SFX LX էջ	իջում/DE . 
SFX LX դուռ	դռնում/DE  .

# միութեան, արեան
SFX G1 Y 2
SFX G1	յուն	յան/DE           .
SFX G1	0	յան/DE		.

# ձիու
SFX G2 Y 5
SFX G2	0	ու	.
SFX G2	0	ուս	.
SFX G2	0	ուդ	.
SFX G2	0	ուն	.
SFX G2	ի	ու/DE	.

# ayi, oyi
SFX G4 Y 2
SFX G4  ա	այի/DE	.
SFX G4  ո	ոյի/DE	.

# այր
SFX G7 Y 4
SFX G7	այր	որ/DEABINLO	.
SFX G7	եր	որ/DEABINLO	.
SFX G7	ուստր	ստեր/DE		.
SFX G7	մեջ	միջի/DE		.
