dictionaries/hy/src/hy_AM.dic
Ղարաբաղ/DEDIABGEINLO
անհանդուրժողություն/DEABG1I1INLOPP
անվկա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
անուշություն/DEABG1I1INLOPP
աշխարհագրագետ/DEABGEINLOPP
ապավինում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
աստված/DEABGEINLOPP
ավելադրություն/DEABG1I1INLOPP
ատամնախիլ/DEABGEINLOPM
արծաթաջրում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
արտահանում/DEABG9I3GEPPI5IN
արքայամայր/DEG7PM
արևածաղիկ/DEAXGXIXLXPP
արևածին/DEAXGXIXLXPP
ափամեջ/DEA3G7I3L3
բագին/DEPXAXGXIXLX
բամբակամանարան/DEABGEINLOPP
բարի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
բարձրամտել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
բլանդում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
բշտոտել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
բորոտություն/DEABG1I1INLOPP
բռնաճնշում/DEABG9I3GEPPI5IN
գայթ/DEABGEINLOPP
գեղածալ/DEABGEINLOPM
գեղահյուսում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
գետամեջ/DEA3G7I3L3
գիշեր/DEAAGAINLOPPGEA2
գիշերհանա/DEA4G4I4L4
գրամեքենա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
գրչեղբայր/DEG7PP
դաշտամեջ/DEA3G7I3L3
դառնախորհուրդ/DEPPAXGXIXLX
դառնակսկիծ/DEPPAXGXIXLX
դառնասիրտ/DEAXGXIXLXPX
դասագին/DEPXAXGXIXLX
դժվարին/CCDEABGEINLOPP
դիտանկյուն/DEABG1I1INLOPP
դիտողականություն/DEABG1I1INLOPP
դիրքորոշում/DEABG9I3GEPPI5IN
դրոշմահատոց/DEABGEINLOPP
դրվատել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
դրվատվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
դուռ/DEAXGXIXLXPI
ետնադուռ/DEPXAXGXIXLXPI
երգացանկ/DEABGEINLOPM
երեխամայր/DEG7PM
երեկո/DEA4G4I4L4PP
երիզել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
երկաթուղի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
երկնավոր/DEABGEINLOPP
զարդարել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
զգեստափոխում/DEABG9I3GEPPI5IN
էսօր/DEAAGAINLOPMGEAB
թելադրում/DEABG9I3GEPPI5IN
թերալցում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
թմրեցում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
թռչնախումբ/DEPXAXGXIXLX
թուրքմենական/DEABGEINLOPP
ժամանակ/DEAAGAINLOPPGEAB
ժողովրդավարական/DEABGEINLOPP
ժրագլուխ/DEPPAXGXIXLX
իմաստակիր/DEAXGXIXLXPP
լայնել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
լայնուղի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
լեռնամեջ/DEA3G7I3L3
լերդախոց/DEABGEINLOPM
լոքո/DEA4G4I4L4PP
լուսամայր/DEG7PM
լուսավոր/CCDEABGEINLOPP
խաղարվեստ/DEABGEINLOPP
խելահեղել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
խճուղի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
խմբովին/DEABG1I1INLOPP
խնամակալություն/DEABG1I1INLOPP
խրոնիկական/DEABGEINLOPP
ծովաշուն/DEGDAXLXIXPX
կակազել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
կականել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
կարգաթիվ/DEAXGXIXLXPX
կարգավիճակ/DEABGEINLOPP
կարեկից/DEAXGXIXLXPP
կարևոր/CCDEABGEINLOPP
կերպավորում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
կնճռել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
կոլեկտիվացվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
հաճախություն/DEABG1I1INLO
հայորդի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
հաստոտնանի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
հասցեագրել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
հավկիթախաղ/DEABGEINLOPM
հատկացագիր/DEABGEINLOPX
հարաբերել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
հարթություն/DEABG1I1INLOPP
հարմարավետություն/DEABG1I1INLOPP
հարսնահայր/DEG7PM
հետաքրքիր/CCDEABG9I3GEPPIN
հնարում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
հոգեբուժական/DEABGEINLOPP
հողմածին/DEAXGXIXLXPP
հոնաչիր/DEAXGXIXLXPX
հոնքամեջ/DEA3G7I3L3
հովհարում/DEABG9I3GEPPI5IN
ձախողել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
ձուլում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
մալաչա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
մայր/DEG7PM
մատույց/DEA3G7I3L3
մարդացեղ/DEABGEINLOPM
մաքուր/CCDEABGEINLOPP
մեծագին/DEPXAXGXIXLX
մենանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
մենապարել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
մթնագիշեր/DEAAGAINLOPPGEA1
միահոգի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
միաձեռանի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
միջնադուռ/DEPXAXGXIXLXPI
յոթհարյուր/DEABGEINLOPP
նախադուռ/DEPXAXGXIXLXPI
նախամարդկային/DEABGEINLOPP
նախորոշում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
ներքնադուռ/DEPXAXGXIXLXPI
նկատողություն/DEABG1I1INLOPP
նյարդաբանություն/DEABG1I1INLO
նոտայաթուղթ/DEPXAXGXIXLX
նորալուսին/DEAXGXIXLXPP
նորածին/DEAXGXIXLXPP
նռնաքար/DEABGEINLOPM
շարոտել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
շուտ/AAGAIN
չքնաղ/CCDEABGEINLOPP
պալարագոյացում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
պահմտոցի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
պահունի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
պանդխտավայր/DEABGEINLOPM
պարսպադուռ/DEPXAXGXIXLXPI
պտղատվություն/DEABG1I1INLO
ջրալի/DEABGEINLOPP
ռազմամոլություն/DEABG1I1INLOPP
ռեպրեսիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
ռեսպուբլիկա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
սավայիր/DEA4G4I4L4PPPZ
սլավոնուհի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
սլացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
սյունագիր/DEAXGXIXLXPX
սնամեջ/DEA3G7I3L3
սոսուտ/DEABGEINLOPP
ստուգում/DEABG9I3GEPPI5IN
սրբագործություն/DEABG1I1INLOPP
սրտամաշություն/DEABG1I1INLOPP
վանահայր/DEG7PM
վանդակադուռ/DEPXAXGXIXLXPI
վանդակակերպ/DEABGEINLOPM
վատ/CCDEABGEINLOPM
վերապրում/DEABG9I3GEPPIN
տապկվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
տղմապատ/DEABGEINLOPP
տողամեջ/DEA3G7I3L3
ցերեկ/DEAAGAINLOPP
ցքետուն/DEAXGXIXLXPX
ուխտակից/DEAXGXIXLXPP
ուղարկագիր/DEAXGXIXLXPX
ուղեբաժանք/DEABGEINLOPP
ուշանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
ուրախ/CCDEABGEINLOPP
փայտաքիմիական/DEABGEINLOPP
քաղաքամեջ/DEA3G7I3L3
քեռի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
քթթկենի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
օր/DEAAGAINLOPMGEAB
ֆիլոլոգիա/DEA4G4I4L4
ֆիլոքսերա/DEA4G4I4L4
ֆիրմա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
